Maine, session 132, LD2058.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §1502, 6th ¶, as amended by PL 1989, c. 757, is further amended
to read:
Municipal and county jails shall at all times be available for detention of persons
arrested by state or any other law enforcement officers, unless the persons are detained
solely for a civil violation of federal immigration laws. In those municipalities where full-
time supervision of the jail is not provided by the municipality, full responsibility for the
safekeeping and welfare of any person detained shall rest rests solely with the arresting
officer. Expense of any municipality or any damage to the jail resulting from the use of its
jail by any arresting officer shall must be reimbursed to the municipality by the law
enforcement agency for which the arresting officer is acting.
Page 1 - 132LR2823(03)